th: รูปทรงของผ้าเบรก: ดิสก์; ดรัม; เบรกมือ; อื่นๆ
nb: Bremseklossens formfaktor: Skive; Trommel; Parkeringsbrems; Annet
ru: Формфактор тормозной колодки: Дисковые; Барабанные; Стояночный тормоз; Другое
da: Formfaktor for bremseklods: Skive; Tromle; Parkeringsbremse; Andet
vi: Kiểu dáng má phanh: Đĩa; Trống; Phanh đỗ xe; Khác
pt-BR: Fator de forma da pastilha de freio: Disco; Tambor; Freio de estacionamento; Outro
pt-PT: Fator de forma da pastilha de travão: Disco; Tambor; Travão de estacionamento; Outro
ja: ブレーキパッドフォームファクター: ディスク; ドラム; パーキングブレーキ; その他
es: Factor de forma de la pastilla de freno: Disco; Tambor; Freno de estacionamiento; Otro
bg-BG: Типоразмер на спирачните накладки: Дискова; Барабанна; Ръчна спирачка; Други
hr-HR: Faktor oblika kočionih pločica: Disk; Bubanj; Parkirna kočnica; Ostalo
sl-SI: Oblika zavornih ploščic: Kolut; Boben; Parkirna zavora; Drugo
ko: 브레이크 패드 형태: 디스크; 드럼; 주차 브레이크; 기타
ro-RO: Factor de formă al plăcuțelor de frână: Disc; Tambur; Frână de parcare; Altele
de: Formfaktor des Bremsbelags: Scheibenbremse; Trommelbremse; Feststellbremse; Sonstige
sk-SK: Tvar brzdových doštičiek: Kotúčová; Bubnová; Parkovacia brzda; Iný
en: Brake pad form factor: Disc; Drum; Parking brake; Other
cs: Tvar a rozměry (form factor) brzdových destiček: Kotoučové; Bubnové; Parkovací brzda; Jiné
pl: Forma klocka hamulcowego: Tarczowe; Bębnowe; Hamulec postojowy; Inne
it: fattore di forma della pastiglia del freno: Disco; Tamburo; Freno di stazionamento; Altro
tr: Fren balatası form faktörü: Disk; Kampana; El freni; Diğer
el: Συντελεστής μορφής τακακιού φρένων: Δίσκου; Ταμπούρου; Φρένο στάθμευσης; Άλλο
zh-TW: 煞車片外型規格: 碟式; 鼓式; 駐車煞車; 其他
sv: Bromsbeläggens formfaktor: Skiva; Trumma; Parkeringsbroms; Övrigt
nl: Remblok vormfactor: Schijf; Trommel; Parkeerrem; Overig
hu: Fékbetét formája: Tárcsa; Dob; Rögzítőfék; Egyéb
fi: Jarrupalojen muotokerroin: Levy; Rumpu; Seisontajarru; Muu
lt-LT: Stabdžių kaladėlės formos faktorius: Diskinis; Būgninis; Stovėjimo stabdis; Kitas
fr: Forme de la plaquette de frein: Disque; Tambour; Frein de stationnement; Autre
zh-CN: 刹车片外形尺寸: 盘式; 鼓式; 驻车制动器; 其他